test/src/morphology/mrj-test-N-ava_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ӓвӓ: # Noun 'mother'
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Nom: ӓвӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Gen: ӓвӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Acc: ӓвӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Com: ӓвӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Dat: ӓвӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ine: ӓвӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ill: ӓвӓшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Lat: ӓвӓш
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Comp: ӓвӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Abe: ӓвӓде
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom: ӓвӓвлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Gen: ӓвӓвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Acc: ӓвӓвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Com: ӓвӓвлӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Dat: ӓвӓвлӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ine: ӓвӓвлӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ill: ӓвӓвлӓшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Lat: ӓвӓвлӓш
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Comp: ӓвӓвлӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Abe: ӓвӓвлӓде

     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Nom: [ӓвӓм, ӓвӓэм] # х2 ӓвӓэмжӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Gen: ӓвӓмӹн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Acc: ӓвӓмӹн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Com: ӓвӓмге
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Dat: ӓвӓмлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ine: ӓвӓмӹштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ill: ӓвӓмӹшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Lat: ӓвӓмӹш
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Comp: ӓвӓмлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Abe: ӓвӓмде
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom: [ӓвӓмвлӓ, ӓвӓэмвлӓ, ӓвӓвлӓэм] # х3
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Gen: ӓвӓмвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Acc: ӓвӓмвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Com: ӓвӓмвлӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Dat: ӓвӓмвлӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ine: ӓвӓмвлӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ill: ӓвӓмвлӓшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Lat: ӓвӓмвлӓш
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Comp: ӓвӓмвлӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Abe: ӓвӓмвлӓде
#ӓвӓт, ӓвӓэт, ӓвӓэтшӹ, 
#ӓвӓжӹ, 
